Hawaii, session 2026, HB1903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter Hawaii space commission §   -1 Definitions.  For purposes of this chapter: "Board" means the Hawaii space commission board. "Commission" means the Hawaii space commission. "Department" means the department of business, economic development, and tourism. §   -2 Hawaii space commission; established.  (a) There is established within the department for administrative purposes the Hawaii space commission. (b)  The purpose of the commission shall be to promote innovation in the fields of space exploration and commercial aerospace, including the integration of the space, aeronautics, and aviation industries into the economy of the State. §   -3 Hawaii space commission board; established.  (a) The commission shall be governed by a board of directors to be known as the Hawaii space commission board.  The board shall comprise: (1)  Three members appointed by the governor under section 26-34; (2)  Three members appointed by the president of the senate; and (3)  Three members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. (b)  In making appointments under subsection (a), the governor, president of the senate, and speaker of the house of representatives shall prioritize appointing individuals who have experience in: (1)  Commercial aerospace; (2)  Civil aviation; (3)  Military aerospace; (4)  Space-related economic development; (5)  Space-related academic research; and (6)  Nonprofit support of the space industry. (c)  The board shall: (1)  Oversee the commission; (2)  Oversee the development of a strategic plan; and (3)  Establish appropriate standards to ensure the proper use of any funds authorized under this chapter for research and facilities development. §   -4 Hawaii space commission; powers and duties.  (a)  In addition to any other powers and duties provided by this chapter, the commission shall: (1)  Identify research and funding opportunities for entities in the State that: (A)  Strengthen and enhance the development of space flight infrastructure; (B)  Enhance integration of the space, aeronautics, astronautics, and aviation industries into the State's economy; and (C)  Promote research involving materials derived from or developed through space exploration and space flight; and (2)  Support workforce training for space exploration. (b)  The commission may: (1)  Adopt and use an official seal; (2)  Solicit and accept gifts or grants, and contract with any entity; (3)  Acquire and convey property or an interest in property; (4)  Procure insurance as the board considers necessary and advisable to accomplish the commission's purposes; (5)  Make grants to public or private persons having an established presence in the State to encourage economic development related to space exploration; (6)  Make grants to enhance the capacity of institutions of higher education to participate in and support classified research; (7)  Provide matching funding for external funding provided by relevant federal agencies, the private industry, or private research organizations; (8)  Engage in the planning and implementation of aerospace-related educational opportunities within the State in coordination with the Pacific international center for high technology research under section 304A-3101; and (9)  Adopt rules under chapter 91 for purposes of this chapter. §   -5  Executive director.  The board shall appoint an executive director of the commission, who shall: (1)  Serve as the commission's chief executive officer; (2)  Be responsible for developing and administering the commission's programs under the board's direction; (3)  Serve on a part-time or full-time basis; (4)  Have a demonstrated ability to lead and develop academic, commercial, military, or governmental partnerships and coalitions; (5)  Be familiar with the people and cultures of Hawaii; (6)  Be exempt from chapter 76; and (7)  Employ staff under chapter 76, within available appropriations. §   -6  Strategic plan; annual report.  (a) The commission shall develop and annually update a strategic plan for the promotion of space, aeronautics, and aviation economic development within the State. (b)  The strategic plan shall identify potential projects that further the purpose of the commission, and, for each project: (1)  The estimated total cost for completion, including any potential state matching costs; and (2)  An assessment of the availability of external funding sources. (c)  The strategic plan may include any other information the commission deems relevant to furthering the purpose of the commission. (d)  The commission shall prepare an annual report of its activities for the prior fiscal year. (e)  The commission shall submit the annual report and the latest strategic plan to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to each regular legislative session. §   -7  Space exploration and aeronautics research special fund.  (a) There is established the space exploration and aeronautics research special fund to provide grants to eligible entities. (b)  The fund shall be composed of: (1)  Gifts, grants, and donations provided to the commission; and (2)  Moneys appropriated to the fund by the legislature. (c)  The commission may provide grants to eligible entities for: (1)  The development of emerging technologies required for any aspect of human space flight; (2)  Research involving any aspect of space exploration and space flight; (3)  Workforce training to promote space exploration and space flight; (4)  The curation of post-mission materials involved in space exploration and space flight; and (5)  The development of infrastructure useful or necessary for establishing and maintaining a spaceport. (d)  The following entities shall be eligible for a grant under this section: (1)  A business or nonprofit entity involved in the space exploration, research, or aeronautics industry; and (2)  A governmental entity with which the commission has entered into an intergovernmental agreement for the purpose of advancing space exploration, research, or the aeronautics industry." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for deposit into the space exploration and aeronautics research special fund. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the space exploration and aeronautics research special fund the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii space commission to award grants to eligible entities. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii space commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and operation of the Hawaii space commission. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________